Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 2
INVESTIGATIONS AND LAW ENFORCEMENT

19-2.5-201. Preliminary investigation.

Whenever it appears to a law enforcement officer or any other person that a juvenile is or appears to be within the court's jurisdiction, as provided in section 19-2.5-103, the law enforcement officer or other person may refer the matter conferring or
appearing to confer jurisdiction to the district attorney, who shall determine whether the interests of the juvenile or of the community require further action.

Upon the district attorney's request, the matter may be referred to any agency for an investigation and recommendation.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 567, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-510 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-202. Consent to search.

In determining the voluntariness of a juvenile's consent to a search or seizure, the court shall consider the totality of the circumstances.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 567, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-506 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-203. Statements - definitions.

A statement or admission of a juvenile made as a result of the custodial interrogation of the juvenile by a law enforcement official concerning delinquent acts alleged to have been committed by the juvenile are not admissible in evidence against the juvenile
unless a parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian of the juvenile was present at such interrogation and the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian were advised of the juvenile's right
to remain silent and that any statements made may be used against the juvenile in a court of law, of the juvenile's right to the presence of an attorney during such interrogation, and of the juvenile's right to have counsel appointed
if the juvenile so requests at the time of the interrogation; except that, if a public defender or counsel representing the juvenile is present at such interrogation, such statements or admissions may be admissible in evidence
even though the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian was not present.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, statements or admissions of a juvenile may be admissible in evidence, notwithstanding the absence of a parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian, if the court finds that, under the totality of the
circumstances, the juvenile made a knowing, intelligent, and voluntary waiver of rights and:

The juvenile is eighteen years of age or older at the time of the interrogation or the juvenile misrepresents his or her age as being eighteen years of age or older and the law enforcement official acts in good-faith reliance on such misrepresentation
in conducting the interrogation;

The juvenile is emancipated from the parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian; or

The juvenile is a runaway from a state other than Colorado and is of sufficient age and understanding.

For the purposes of this subsection (2), "emancipated juvenile" means a juvenile over fifteen years of age and under eighteen years of age who has, with the real or apparent assent of the juvenile's parents, demonstrated independence from the juvenile's
parents in matters of care, custody, and earnings. The term may include, but is not limited to, any such juvenile who has the sole responsibility for the juvenile's own support, who is married, or who is in the military.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, statements or admissions of a juvenile are not inadmissible in evidence by reason of the absence of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian if the juvenile was accompanied by a responsible adult who was a
custodian of the juvenile or assuming the role of a parent at the time.

For the purposes of this section, "physical custodian" is defined in section 19-2.5-102.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian may expressly waive the requirement that the parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian be present during the juvenile's
interrogation. This express waiver must be in writing and must be obtained only after full advisement of the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian of the juvenile's rights prior to the taking
of the custodial statement by a law enforcement official. If said requirement is expressly waived, statements or admissions of the juvenile are not inadmissible in evidence by reason of the absence of the juvenile's parent, guardian,
or legal or physical custodian during interrogation. Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection (5), a county department of human or social services and the state department of human services, as legal or physical custodian,
may not waive said requirement.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, statements or admissions of a juvenile are not inadmissible into evidence by reason of the absence of a parent, guardian, or legal or physical custodian, if the juvenile makes any deliberate misrepresentations
affecting the applicability or requirements of this section and a law enforcement official, acting in good faith and in reasonable reliance on such deliberate misrepresentation, conducts a custodial interrogation of the juvenile
that does not comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, if the juvenile asserts that statements made during the custodial interrogation are inadmissible because a responsible adult had an interest adverse to the juvenile, the prosecution, as part
of its burden of proof at a hearing on a motion to suppress the statements, must show by a preponderance of the evidence that the person interrogating the juvenile reasonably believed that the responsible adult did not
have any interests adverse to those of the juvenile and that the responsible adult was able to provide protective counseling to the juvenile concerning the juvenile's rights during the interrogation.

For purposes of this subsection (7):

"Protective counseling" means an ongoing opportunity to offer guidance and advice concerning the juvenile's right to remain silent and to obtain retained or appointed counsel associated with the custodial interrogation; and

"Responsible adult" means a parent, guardian, legal or physical custodian, or other responsible adult who was a custodian of the juvenile or who assumed the role of a parent at the time of the interrogation.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 567, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-511 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-204. Issuance of a lawful warrant taking a juvenile into custody.

A lawful warrant taking a juvenile into custody may be issued pursuant to this section by any judge of a court of record or by a juvenile magistrate upon receipt of an affidavit relating facts sufficient to establish probable cause to believe that a delinquent
act has been committed and probable cause to believe that a particular juvenile committed that act. Upon receipt of such affidavit, the judge or magistrate shall issue a lawful warrant commanding any peace officer to take the juvenile
named in the affidavit into custody and to take the juvenile without unnecessary delay before the nearest judge of the juvenile court or magistrate pursuant to section 19-2.5-305 (4)(e)(I).

Upon filing of a petition in the juvenile court, the district attorney may request a warrant to issue that authorizes the taking of a juvenile into temporary custody. If a warrant is requested, the petition must be accompanied by a verified affidavit
relating facts sufficient to establish probable cause that the juvenile has committed the delinquent act set forth in the petition.

A warrant for the arrest of a juvenile for violation of the conditions of probation or of a bond may be issued by any judge of a court of record or juvenile magistrate upon the report of a juvenile probation officer or upon the verified complaint of any
person, establishing to the satisfaction of the judge or juvenile magistrate probable cause to believe that a condition of probation or of a bond has been violated and that the arrest of the juvenile is reasonably necessary. The
warrant may be executed by any juvenile probation officer or by a peace officer authorized to execute warrants in the county in which the juvenile is found. If the warrant is for a juvenile found in contempt of court in a truancy
proceeding, the court shall follow the procedures set forth in section 22-33-108 (7).

Source:

L. 2021:
(3) amended, (SB 21-071), ch. 463, p. 3333, § 1, effective July 6; entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 569, § 2, effective October 1.

19-2.5-205. Search warrants - issuance - grounds.

A search warrant authorized by this section may be issued by any judge of a court of record or by a juvenile magistrate.

A search warrant may be issued pursuant to this section to search for and seize any property:

That is stolen or embezzled; or

That is designed or intended for use as a means of committing a delinquent act; or

That is or has been used as a means of committing a delinquent act; or

The possession of which is illegal; or

That would be material evidence in a subsequent criminal prosecution or delinquency adjudication in this state or in another state; or

The seizure of which is expressly required, authorized, or permitted by any statute of this state; or

That is kept, stored, maintained, transported, sold, dispensed, or possessed in violation of a statute of this state, under circumstances involving a serious threat to public safety or order or to public health.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 570, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-504 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-206. Search warrants - application.

A search warrant shall issue only on affidavit sworn to or affirmed before the judge or juvenile magistrate and relating facts sufficient to:

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the premises, person, place, or thing to be searched;

Identify or describe, as nearly as may be, the property to be searched for, seized, or inspected;

Establish the grounds for issuance of the warrant or probable cause to believe that such grounds exist; and

Establish probable cause to believe that the property to be searched for, seized, or inspected is located at, in, or upon the premises, person, place, or thing to be searched.

The affidavit required by this section may include sworn testimony reduced to writing and signed under oath by the witness giving the testimony before issuance of the warrant. A copy of the affidavit and a copy of the transcript of testimony taken in
support of the request for a search warrant must be attached to the search warrant filed with the court.

The supreme court may establish rules for procedures governing application for and issuance of search warrants consistent with this section.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 570, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-505 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-207. Fingerprinting - juvenile under arrest - ordered by court - definition.

For purposes of this section, "juvenile" means any juvenile who is charged with committing, summoned, or held in detention for committing a delinquent act that constitutes a felony, a class 1 misdemeanor, or a misdemeanor pursuant to section 42-4-1301
or a crime, the underlying factual basis of which included an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1), as if committed by an adult.

Any juvenile detained pursuant to this article 2.5 must be fingerprinted by the entity authorized by the court or the local law enforcement agency to obtain fingerprints, except for juvenile detention centers and alternative service programs, otherwise
known as "SB 91-94 programs", described in section 19-2.5-606. Such entity or local agency shall forward a set of the juvenile's fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation in the form and manner prescribed by
the bureau.

Any fingerprints required by this section to be forwarded to the Colorado bureau of investigation must be forwarded within twenty-four hours after completion of the fingerprinting, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 571, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-503.5 (1), (2), and (4) as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-208. Petty tickets - summons - contracts - data.

If a law enforcement officer contacts a juvenile ten years of age or older for a delinquent act that would be a petty offense if committed by an adult or a municipal ordinance violation, the officer may issue the juvenile a petty ticket that requires
the juvenile to go through an assessment process or procedure as designated by the municipal, county, or district court, including assessment by a law enforcement officer, assessment officer, or a screening team, referred
to in this section as the "screening entity". When a petty ticket is issued, an assessment officer or screening team officer shall offer a petty offense contract to the juvenile and the juvenile's parent or legal guardian
if:

The juvenile has no prior adjudication or non-traffic conviction in a municipal, county, juvenile, or district court;

The alleged offense would be a class 1, class 2, or unclassified petty offense;

The juvenile admits to the offense; and

The petty offense contract is in the best interests of the juvenile.

If the juvenile is otherwise eligible for a petty offense contract pursuant to this subsection (1), but the screening entity finds that the issuance of a petty offense contract is not in the best interests of the juvenile, the screening entity shall state
the reasons in writing. The screening entity shall provide a copy of the written statement to the juvenile and shall maintain a copy of the written statement. If there is no agreement resulting in a signed contract pursuant
to this section, the prosecuting attorney may file a petition of delinquency.

Every contract entered into pursuant to this section must be in writing and contain the following:

Consent to the contract terms by the juvenile and the juvenile's parent or legal guardian;

An agreement to pay restitution, when applicable;

An agreement to perform useful community service, when applicable;

An agreement to attend school unless the juvenile is in a certified home study program or is otherwise legally excused from such attendance;

A requirement of restorative justice practices, when appropriate;

A requirement that the juvenile not commit a delinquent act during the term of the contract; and

Any other conditions determined appropriate by the screening entity.

The term of the contract may not exceed ninety-one days; except that the contract may be extended for an additional thirty-five days for good cause.

Upon the successful completion of the contract to the satisfaction of the screening entity, the juvenile is released from any further obligation, and the prosecuting attorney shall not file a petition in delinquency for the admitted act. The completed
contract remains confidential except to the ticketing agency, the screening and supervisory entity, the juvenile, and the juvenile's parent or legal guardian.

If a juvenile fails to comply with a written condition of the contract within a specific time designated in the contract, the prosecuting attorney may file charges with the court. The contract and any statements contained in the contract or made by the
juvenile to the screening entity administering the contract must not be used against the juvenile.

If there is no agreement resulting in a signed contract, any statement made by the juvenile to the screening entity administering the assessment must not be used against the juvenile.

Notwithstanding subsections (5)(a) and (5)(b) of this section, statements or admissions of a juvenile contained in the contract or made by the juvenile to the screening entity are admissible into evidence, if the juvenile makes any deliberate misrepresentations
affecting the applicability or requirements of this section.

Each law enforcement agency that issues petty offense tickets pursuant to this section shall maintain annual data on the number of tickets issued and the age, ethnicity, gender, and final disposition for each ticket.

The data collected pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section is public and must be made available upon request.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 571, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-302.5 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-209. Taking juvenile into custody.

A juvenile may be taken into temporary custody by a law enforcement officer without order of the court when there are reasonable grounds to believe that the juvenile has committed a delinquent act.

A juvenile may be taken into temporary custody by a law enforcement officer executing a lawful warrant taking a juvenile into custody issued pursuant to section 19-2.5-204.

A juvenile probation officer may take a juvenile into temporary custody:

Under the circumstances stated in subsection (1) of this section; or

If the juvenile has violated the conditions of probation and is under the continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

A juvenile may be detained temporarily by an adult other than a law enforcement officer if the juvenile has committed or is committing a delinquent act in the presence of such adult. Any person detaining a juvenile shall notify, without unnecessary delay,
a law enforcement officer, who shall assume custody of said juvenile.

The taking of a juvenile into temporary custody pursuant to this section is not an arrest, nor does it constitute a police record.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 573, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-502 as it existed prior to 2021.